Maryland, session 2026, SB0604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–3A–38.
(A) A CHILD PLACEMENT AGENCY MAY NOT DENY AN INDIVIDUAL’S
APPLICATION TO BE AN ADOPTIVE PARENT:
(1) BECAUSE THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) IS DIVORCED;
(II) IS SEPARATED FROM A SPOUSE;
(III) IS NOT MARRIED;
(IV) HAS OTHER CHILDREN IN THE FAMILY;
(V) DOES NOT OWN A HOME; OR
(VI) IS UNABLE TO PAY A REASONABLE FEE FOR ADOPTION
SERVICES; OR
(2) BECAUSE OF THE APPLICANT’S OR ADOPTIVE CHILD’S:
(I) RACE;
(II) COLOR;
(III) CULTURE;
(IV) NATIONAL ORIGIN;
(V) SEXUAL ORIENTATION;

SENATE BILL 604 3
(VI) ETHNICITY; OR
(VII) GENDER IDENTITY.
(B) A CHILD PLACEMENT AGENCY SHALL DENY AN APPLICATION IF THE
AGENCY DETERMINES THAT AN APPLICANT:
(1) HAS A CHILD SUPPORT ACCOUNT THAT IS IN SUBSTANTIAL
ARREARAGE, WHICH MAY AFFECT THE APPLICANT’S ABILITY TO PROVIDE FOR THE
ADOPTIVE CHILD;
(2) HAS INSUFFICIENT FUNDS TO PROVIDE ADEQUATELY FOR THE
ADOPTIVE CHILD;
(3) HAS PHYSICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH ISSUES THAT PRECLUDE THE
ABILITY TO PARENT THE ADOPTIVE CHILD;
(4) IS UNDER THE AGE OF 18 YEARS;
(5) HAS A CRIMINAL BACKGROUND OR RECORD OF CHILD ABUSE OR
NEGLECT THAT PRECLUDES THE POSSIBILITY OF BEING AN ADOPTIVE PARENT;
(6) HAS AN ACTIVE ADOPTION APPLICATION OR HOME STUDY WITH
ANOTHER CHILD PLACEMENT AGENCY;
(7) HAD A PREVIOUS APPLICATION DENIED FOR A VALID REASON;
(8) IS A MEMBER OF THE CHILD PLACEMENT AGENCY’S GOVERNING
BOARD;
(9) IS AN ADOPTION SERVICE EMPLOYEE OF THE CHILD PLACEMENT
AGENCY;
(10) HAS A LIVING SPACE THAT IS INADEQUATE FOR AN ADDITIONAL
FAMILY MEMBER; OR
(11) KNOWINGLY PROVIDED FALSE INFORMATION ON THE
APPLICATION.
5–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.

SENATE BILL 604
(b) “Administration” means:
(1) the Social Services Administration of the Department; or
(2) any other unit within the Department to which the Secretary of Human
Services has delegated in writing specified responsibilities of the Administration under this
subtitle.
(c) “Foster care” means continuous 24–hour care and supportive services
provided for a minor child placed by a child placement agency in an approved family home.
5–525.
(M) THE ADMINISTRATION AND ANY AGENCY, INSTITUTION, OR FACILITY
THAT ADMINISTERS FOSTER CARE IN THE STATE MAY NOT DISCRIMINATE AGAINST
A FOSTER PARENT, A PROSPECTIVE FOSTER PARENT, OR A CHILD IN FOSTER CARE
BASED ON:
(1) SEXUAL ORIENTATION;
(2) GENDER IDENTITY; OR
(3) MARITAL STATUS.
Article – Human Services
2–214.
(A) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “LOCAL DEPARTMENT” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 3–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION,
THE DEPARTMENT, A LOCAL DEPARTMENT, OR ANY INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY THAT
RECEIVES FUNDS FROM THE DEPARTMENT, OR FROM WHOM THE DEPARTMENT
PURCHASES SERVICES, MAY NOT DISCRIMINATE:
(1) IN THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO THE PUBLIC BASED ON:
(I) RACE;
(II) RELIGION;
(III) COLOR;
(IV) NATIONAL ORIGIN;

SENATE BILL 604 5
(V) SEX;
(VI) PHYSICAL OR MENTAL DISABILITY;
(VII) AGE;
(VIII) SEXUAL ORIENTATION; OR
(IX) GENDER IDENTITY; OR
(2) IN EMPLOYMENT PRACTICES BASED ON:
(I) POLITICAL OR RELIGIOUS AFFILIATION OR OPINION;
(II) MARITAL STATUS; OR
(III) A CHARACTERISTIC LISTED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(C) DISCRIMINATION THAT IS OTHERWISE PROHIBITED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION IS AUTHORIZED WHEN THE DISTINCTION IS
BASED ON:
(1) SEX OR AGE AS AUTHORIZED OR REQUIRED BY STATUTE;
(2) RELIGION WHEN NECESSARY TO PROTECT THE RELIGIOUS
HERITAGE OF A MINOR; OR
(3) DISABILITY WHEN NECESSARY TO PROVIDE DISABLED
INDIVIDUALS WITH AID, CARE, SERVICES, OR BENEFITS THAT ARE COMPARABLE TO
THOSE PROVIDED TO ALL RECIPIENTS.
(D) THE PROHIBITIONS OF THIS SECTION DO NOT APPLY IF THE
DISCRIMINATORY PRACTICES ARE AUTHORIZED BY ANOTHER LAW.
3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Local department” means:
(1) a local department of social services created or continued in a county
under § 3–201 of this title; or

SENATE BILL 604
(2) in Montgomery County, the Montgomery County government.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.